Washington statutes.
RCW 36.70.140

Planning agency—Rules and records.

Each planning agency shall adopt rules for the transaction of its business and shall keep a public record of its transactions, findings, and determinations.

[ 1963 c 4 s 36.70.140. Prior: 1959 c 201 s 14.]